Vermont, session 2025-2026, H818.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1433 is added to read:
§ 1433. MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING PROGRAM
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Education.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Mental Health.
(b) The Agency, in collaboration with the Department, shall develop and
administer a program authorizing each supervisory union to provide or arrange
for the provision of evidence-based mental health screening services within the
schools it oversees. The mental health screening services provided pursuant to
this section shall be approved by the Agency, in consultation with the
VT LEG #384844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.818
2026 Page 2 of 5
Department. Mental health screening services provided by a supervisory union
shall:
(1) be age appropriate for each grade served;
(2) screen for those mental health conditions determined by the Board of
Education in rule; and
(3) effectively identify whether a student has a mental health condition
requiring intervention or treatment.
(c) Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the State Board of Education, in
collaboration with the Department, shall adopt rules for the administration of
this program that address the following:
(1) the process for a supervisory union to notify the Agency of its
decision to participate in the mental health screening program;
(2) access to and use of a participating student’s screening data
consistent with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g and 34 C.F.R. Part 99 (FERPA), and any relevant provisions of
State law;
(3) annual training requirements related to the mental health screening
program;
(4) specific mental health conditions that the mental health screening
services seek to identify; and
VT LEG #384844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.818
2026 Page 3 of 5
(5) the process and specific criteria for distribution of financial support
pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
(d) On or before July 1 of each year, a supervisory union shall notify the
Agency, in a manner specified in rule, as to whether the supervisory union
intends to participate in the mental health screening program for the following
academic year. A participating supervisory union shall:
(1) select and seek approval from the Department regarding the mental
health screening services it plans to offer as part of its participation in the
program;
(2) annually notify parents and guardians with a student in the
supervisory union that the parent or guardian may choose to have the student
screened for mental health conditions;
(3) obtain prior written consent from a student’s parent or guardian prior
to conducting a mental health screening in manner that complies with FERPA;
(4) provide or cause to be provided the approved mental health
screening services to participating students;
(5) notify parents and guardians of the results of a participating student’s
mental health screening;
(6) discuss resources with the parents and guardians of a participating
student who screens positive for a potential mental health condition; and
VT LEG #384844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.818
2026 Page 4 of 5
(7) use funds distributed by the Agency for expenses related to
participation in the program pursuant to subsection (e) of this section,
including services for certain students screening positive for a mental health
condition.
(e) To the extent funds permit, the Agency shall distribute funds
appropriated for this purpose to supervisory unions participating in the mental
health screening program established in this section. Of the funds available for
the mental health screening program, 90 percent shall be distributed to
participating supervisory unions based on the previous year’s average daily
membership count and 10 percent shall be available as needed to participating
supervisory unions that have exhausted other funds distributed for this purpose.
Funds distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be used to fund mental
health screening services and trainings for school personnel, and for those
services recommended to a student screening positive for a potential mental
health condition when a parent or guardian does not have the financial
resources to provide the recommended services.
(f) A school employee receiving training pursuant to this chapter shall be
immune from civil or criminal liability with regard to mental health screening
services, unless the employee’s actions constituted recklessness, gross
negligence, or intentional misconduct.
VT LEG #384844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.818
2026 Page 5 of 5
(g) Annually on July 1, the Agency, in collaboration with the Department,
shall submit a report to the House Committee on Health Care and to the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare describing:
(1) the number of participating students who received a mental health
screening pursuant to this section during the previous school year;
(2) the number of participating students referred to additional services or
for whom intervention was required;
(3) how funds distributed to participating supervisory unions were used;
and
(4) whether the distributed funds were sufficient to meet supervisory
union needs under this section.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION; MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING PROGRAM
In fiscal year 2027, $10,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Education for the mental health screening program established in
16 V.S.A. § 1433.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384844 v.1